Nebraska, session 109, LB452.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB452 LB452
2025 2025
Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate
$500,000 for FY2025-26 and $500,000 for FY2026-27 from federal funds to
the Department of Health and Human Services for state aid.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$500,000 Federal Funds and for FY2026-27 $500,000 Federal Funds for court
appointed special advocate state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program
$500,000 for FY2025-26 from federal Temporary Assistance for Needy
Families funds and $500,000 for FY2026-27 from federal Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families funds.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-